Nevada, session 83, SB294.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 630.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.275 The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
licensure of a physician assistant, including, but not limited to:
-
*SB294_R1*

– 2 –
1. The educational and other qualifications of applicants.
2. The required academic program for applicants.
3. The procedures for applications for and the issuance of
licenses.
4. The procedures deemed necessary by the Board for
applications for and the initial issuance of licenses by endorsement
pursuant to NRS 630.2751 or 630.2752.
5. The tests or examinations of applicants required by the
Board.
6. The medical services which a physician assistant may
perform, except that a physician assistant may not perform those
specific functions and duties delegated or restricted by law to
persons licensed as dentists, chiropractic physicians, naprapaths,
podiatric physicians and optometrists under chapters 631, 634,
634B, 635 and 636, respectively, of NRS, or as hearing aid
specialists.
7. The duration, renewal and termination of licenses, including
licenses by endorsement. The Board shall not require a physician
assistant to receive or maintain certification by the National
Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants, or its
successor organization, or by any other nationally recognized
organization for the accreditation of physician assistants to satisfy
any continuing education requirements for the renewal of licenses.
8. The grounds and procedures respecting disciplinary actions
against physician assistants.
9. The supervision of medical services of a physician assistant
by a supervising physician [.] , which must authorize a supervising
physician to simultaneously supervise not less than six physician
assistants.
10. A physician assistant’s use of equipment that transfers
information concerning the medical condition of a patient in this
State electronically, telephonically or by fiber optics, including,
without limitation, through telehealth, from within or outside this
State or the United States.
Sec. 2. NRS 633.434 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.434 The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
licensure of a physician assistant, including, without limitation:
1. The educational and other qualifications of applicants.
2. The required academic program for applicants.
3. The procedures for applications for and the issuance of
licenses.
4. The procedures deemed necessary by the Board for
applications for and the issuance of initial licenses by endorsement
pursuant to NRS 633.4335 and 633.4336.
5. The tests or examinations of applicants by the Board.
-
*SB294_R1*

– 3 –
6. The medical services which a physician assistant may
perform, except that a physician assistant may not perform
osteopathic manipulative therapy or those specific functions and
duties delegated or restricted by law to persons licensed as dentists,
chiropractic physicians, doctors of Oriental medicine, naprapaths,
podiatric physicians, optometrists and hearing aid specialists under
chapters 631, 634, 634A, 634B, 635, 636 and 637B, respectively, of
NRS.
7. The grounds and procedures respecting disciplinary actions
against physician assistants.
8. The supervision of medical services of a physician assistant
by a supervising osteopathic physician [.] , which must authorize a
supervising osteopathic physician to simultaneously supervise not
less than six physician assistants.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective:
1. Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
2. On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB294_R1*